en: Tomato sauces
bg: Доматен сос
ca: Salsa de tomàquet
da: Tomatsovser, Tomatsovse, Tomatsaucer, Tomatsauce
de: Tomatensaucen
es: Salsas de tomate
fi: tomaattikastikkeet
fr: Sauces tomate, sauce tomate
he: רטבי עגבניות
hr: umak od rajčice
hu: Paradicsom szószok
it: Salse di pomodoro, passata di pomodoro
ja: トマトソース
lt: Pomidorų padažai
nl: Tomatensauzen
pl: Sosy pomidorowe, Sos pomidorowy
pt: Molhos de tomate
ro: Sosuri de roșii
ru: Томатные соусы, Томатный соус, Соус томатный, Соусы томатные
sv: Tomatsåser, Tomatsås
tr: Domates sosu
zh: 番茄酱

en: Tomato sauces with basil, Tomato basil pasta sauces
bg: Доматен сос с босилек
da: Tomatsovser med basilikum
de: Tomatensaucen mit Basilikum
es: Salsas de tomate con albahaca
fi: Basilika-tomaattikastikeet, Tomaatti-basilikapastakastikkeet
fr: Sauces tomates au basilic
hr: Umaci od rajčice s bosiljkom
it: Sughi di Pomodoro al Basilico, Sughi di Pomodoro e Basilico
lt: Pomidorų padažai su baziliku
sv: Tomatsåser med basilika

en: Tomato sauces with garlic
da: Tomatsovser med hvidløg
sv: Tomatsåser med vitlök

en: Tomato sauces with mushrooms
bg: Доматен сос с гъби
da: Tomatsovser med svampe
fr: Sauces tomates aux champignons
hr: Umaci od rajčice s gljivama
lt: Pomidorų padažai su grybais
sv: Tomatsåser med svampar

en: Pimented tomato sauces
fr: Sauces tomates pimentées

en: Tomato sauces with vegetables
da: Tomatsovser med grøntsager
de: Tomatensaucen mit Gemüse
fr: Sauces tomate aux petits légumes, Sauces tomates aux légumes
hr: Umaci od rajčice s povrćem
lt: Pomidorų padažai su daržovėmis
nl: Tomatensauzen met groente
pl: Sosy pomidorowe z warzywami
sv: Tomatsåser med grönsaker

en: Tomato sauces with olives
bg: Доматен сос с маслини
da: Tomatsovser med oliven
de: Tomatensaucen mit Oliven
fr: Sauces tomates aux olives
hr: Umaci od rajčice s maslinama
lt: Pomidorų padažai su alyvuogėmis
pl: Sosy pomidorowe z oliwkami
sv: Tomatsåser med oliver

en: Tomato sauces with cheese
de: Tomatensaucen mit Käse
fr: Sauces tomate au fromage
hr: Umaci od rajčice sa sirom
lt: Pomidorų padažai su sūriu
pl: Sosy pomidorowe z serem

en: Tomato sauces with parmesan cheese
fr: Sauces tomates au parmesan
hr: Umaci od rajčice s parmezanom
lt: Pomidorų padažai su parmezano sūriu

en: Tomato sauces with ricotta
bg: Доматен сос с рикота
fr: Sauces tomates à la ricotta
hr: Umaci od rajčice s ricottom
lt: Pomidorų padažai su rikota sūriu

en: Brava sauce, Salsas bravas, Salsa brava
es: Salsas bravas, Salsa brava
fr: Sauces bravas, Sauce brava, Salsas bravas, Salsa brava
hr: Brava umak
ja: ブラバスソース
nl: Brava sauzen

en: Ketchup
xx: Ketchup
bg: Кетчуп
ca: Quètxup
es: Kétchups, Krtchups
fi: ketsuppi
he: קטשופ
hr: ketchap
ja: ケチャップ
lt: Kečupas
nl: Ketchups
pl: Ketchup, Keczup, Ketchupy
ru: Кетчуп
tr: Ketçap

en: Tomato Ketchup
bg: Доматен кетчуп
da: Tomatketchup
de: Tomatenketchup
fr: Ketchup de tomate
hr: Kečap
ja: トマトケチャップ
lt: Pomidorų kečupas
pl: Ketchup pomidorowy, Keczup pomidorowy
ru: Томатный кетчуп
sv: Tomatketchup
tr: Domates Ketçabı

en: Curry ketchups
ar: كَتشب الكاري
ca: Quètxup al curri
da: Karryketchup
de: Curryketchup
eo: Karekeĉupoj
fa: کچاپ کاری
fr: Ketchup au curry
jv: Kari saos tomat
ko: 커리 케첩
nb: Kariketsjuper, Kariketchuper
nl: Curryketchup
nn: Kariketsjupar, Kariketchupar
ru: Карри-кетчуп
sv: Curryketchup
zh: 咖哩番茄醬

en: Neapolitan sauces
de: Neapolitanische Saucen
es: Salsas napolitanas
fr: Sauces napolitaines
hr: Napuljski umaci
lt: Neapolietiški padažai
nl: Napolitaanse sauzen

en: Sicilian sauces
es: Salsas sicilianas
fr: Sauces siciliennes
hr: Sicilijanski umaci
lt: Sicilietiški padažai
nl: Siciliaanse sauzen

en: Fried tomato sauces, Tomate frito
ca: Salses de tomàquet fregit
de: Gebratene Tomatensoßen
es: Salsas de tomate frito, Tomate frito
fi: paistetut tomaattikastikkeet
fr: Sauces tomates frites
hr: Umaci od pržene rajčice
lt: Keptų pomidorų padažai
nl: Tomato frito sauzen

en: Tumacas
es: Tumacas

en: Natural grated tomato
es: Tomate natural rallado
hr: Prirodna ribana rajčica
lt: Natūralus trintas pomidoras

en: Strained tomatoes, Passata, Canned tomato coulis semi-reduced to 11%, Canned tomato puree semi-reduced to 11%
de: Passierte Tomaten
fr: Coulis de tomates, coulis de tomate, Coulis de tomate appertisé mi-réduit à 11%, Purée de tomates appertisée mi-réduite à 11%
hr: Pasirane rajčice
it: Passata
nl: Gezeefde tomaten, Passata, Tomatencoulis
pl: Przetarte pomidory, Passata
sv: Passerade tomater